src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb_Prefixes_Int2
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮨ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮳ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮳ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮳ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮹ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮹ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮻ 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮹ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ᏺ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮼ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ᏺ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮼ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮫ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;

LEXICON Suffix_Present_ha
+V+Pres:Ꭽ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Present_ga
+V+Pres:Ꭶ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Present_a
+V+Pres:Ꭰ  PersonFeatures ;
! +V+Pres:a  PersonFeatures ;
! +V+Pres:D  PersonFeatures ; ! Checking how this works

LEXICON Suffix_Habitual_hoi
+V+Hab:ᎰᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Habitual_goi
+V+Hab:ᎪᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Habitual_sgoi
+V+Hab:ᏍᎪᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Future_tli
+V+Fut:Ꮯ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Future_si
+V+Fut:Ꮟ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Future_hi
+V+Fut:Ꭿ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Future_i
+V+Fut:Ꭲ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Future_li
+V+Fut:Ꮅ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_FutImp_tlvi
+V+FutImp:ᏢᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_FutImp_svi
+V+FutImp:ᏒᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_FutImp_hvi
+V+FutImp:ᎲᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_FutImp_vi
+V+FutImp:ᎥᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_FutImp_lvi
+V+FutImp:ᎸᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RemPast_tlvi
+V+RemPast:ᏢᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RemPast_svi
+V+RemPast:ᏒᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RemPast_hvi
+V+RemPast:ᎲᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RemPast_vi
+V+RemPast:ᎥᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RemPast_lvi
+V+RemPast:ᎸᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RepPast_tlei
+V+RepPast:ᏞᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RepPast_sei
+V+RepPast:ᏎᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RepPast_hei
+V+RepPast:ᎮᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RepPast_ei
+V+RepPast:ᎡᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RepPast_lei
+V+RepPast:ᎴᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_ImmPast_ga
+V+ImmPast:Ꭶ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_ImmPast_hi
+V+ImmPast:Ꭿ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_ImmPast_ta
+V+ImmPast:Ꮤ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_ImmPast_da
+V+ImmPast:Ꮣ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_ImmPast_na
+V+ImmPast:Ꮎ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_PresImp_ga
+V+PresImp:Ꭶ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_PresImp_hi
+V+PresImp:Ꭿ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_PresImp_ta
+V+PresImp:Ꮤ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_PresImp_da
+V+PresImp:Ꮣ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_PresImp_na
+V+PresImp:Ꮎ  PersonFeatures ;

! LEXICON Suffix_ImmPast_ga
! +V+ImmPast:Ꭶ  PersonFeatures ;

! LEXICON Suffix_ImmPast_hi
! +V+ImmPast:Ꭿ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Infinitive_sdi
+V+Inf:ᏍᏗ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Infinitive_di
+V+Inf:Ꮧ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON PersonFeatures

< "+1sg":0 "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > # ;
< "+2dl":0 "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > # ;
< "+2pl":0 "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > # ;
< "+2sg":0 "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > # ;
< "+3sg":0 "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > # ;
< "+3pl":0 "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > # ;
< "+Edl":0 "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > # ;
< "+Epl":0 "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > # ;
< "+Idl":0 "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > # ;
< "+Ipl":0 "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > # ;
