src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:ᏃᎯ Suffix_Present_ha ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦᎯ Suffix_Present_ha ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣᏍ Suffix_Present_ga ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩᏘ Suffix_Present_ha ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩᏘ Suffix_Present_ha ;
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:ᏃᎯ Suffix_Habitual_hoi ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦᎯ Suffix_Habitual_hoi ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣᏍ Suffix_Habitual_goi ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩᏘ Suffix_Habitual_sgoi ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩᏘ Suffix_Habitual_sgoi ;
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:Ꮓ Suffix_Future_tli ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦ Suffix_Future_tli ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣ Suffix_Future_si ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩᏛ Suffix_Future_hi ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩᏛ Suffix_Future_hi ;
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:Ꮓ Suffix_FutImp_tlvi ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦ Suffix_FutImp_tlvi ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣ Suffix_FutImp_svi ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩᏛ Suffix_FutImp_hvi ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩᏛ Suffix_FutImp_hvi ;
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:Ꮓ Suffix_RemPast_tlvi ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦ Suffix_RemPast_tlvi ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣ Suffix_RemPast_svi ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩᏛ Suffix_RemPast_hvi ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩᏛ Suffix_RemPast_hvi ;
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:Ꮓ Suffix_RepPast_tlei ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦ Suffix_RepPast_tlei ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣ Suffix_RepPast_sei ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩᏛ Suffix_RepPast_hei ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩᏛ Suffix_RepPast_hei ;
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:Ꮓ Suffix_ImmPast_ga ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦ Suffix_ImmPast_ga ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣ Suffix_ImmPast_hi ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩ Suffix_ImmPast_ta ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩ Suffix_ImmPast_ta ;
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:Ꮓ Suffix_PresImp_ga ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦ Suffix_PresImp_ga ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣ Suffix_PresImp_hi ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩ Suffix_PresImp_ta ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩ Suffix_PresImp_ta ;
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:ᏃᎯ Suffix_Infinitive_sdi ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦᎯ Suffix_Infinitive_sdi ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣᎯ Suffix_Infinitive_sdi ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩᏛ Suffix_Infinitive_di ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩᏛ Suffix_Infinitive_di ;
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ᏸ Suffix_Present_a ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:ᏂᏙ Suffix_Present_ha ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_Present_a ;
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ᏸ Suffix_Habitual_sgoi ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:ᏂᏙ Suffix_Habitual_hoi ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_Habitual_sgoi ;
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ꮿ Suffix_Future_i ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:ᏂᏙ Suffix_Future_li ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_Future_si ;
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ꮿ Suffix_FutImp_vi ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:ᏂᏙ Suffix_FutImp_lvi ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_FutImp_svi ;
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ꮿ Suffix_RemPast_vi ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:ᏂᏙ Suffix_RemPast_lvi ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_RemPast_svi ;
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ꮿ Suffix_RepPast_ei ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:ᏂᏙ Suffix_RepPast_lei ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_RepPast_sei ;
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ꮿ Suffix_ImmPast_ga ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:Ꮒ Suffix_ImmPast_da ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_ImmPast_na ;
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ꮿ Suffix_PresImp_ga ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:Ꮒ Suffix_PresImp_da ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_PresImp_na ;
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ᏸ Suffix_Infinitive_sdi ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:ᏂᏙ Suffix_Infinitive_sdi ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_Infinitive_sdi ;
